North Carolina statutes. Chapter 131E. Health Care Facilities and Services.
Part 3. Hospital District Act.

§ 131E-40.
Title and purpose.

This Part shall be known as the “Hospital District Act.”

It is the purpose of this Part to authorize the creation of hospital districts to furnish hospital, clinical and similar services to the people of this State.

This Part provides an additional and alternative method for the provision of hospital, clinical and similar services.

This Part shall be construed liberally to effect its purposes.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-41.
Methods of creation of a hospital district.

The voters of an area may petition their county board of commissioners and the North Carolina Medical Care Commission for the creation of a hospital district. All of the area proposed to be included within a hospital district must be located within one county. The petition shall be signed by at least 500 voters of the area described in the petition. However, if the area has less than 1,100 voters, then the minimum number of petitioners shall be 250 voters. The petition shall set forth:

A description of the area to be included within the proposed hospital district;

The names of all municipalities located in whole or in part in the proposed hospital district;

The names of all publicly owned hospitals in the proposed hospital district;

The purpose or purposes sought to be accomplished by the creation of the hospital district; and

The proposed name of the hospital district.

The petition shall be delivered to the county board of commissioners of the county in which the proposed hospital district would be located. If the county board of commissioners approves the creation of the hospital district, they shall have the petition delivered to the North Carolina Medical Care Commission for review under

G.S. 131E-42

.

In the alternative, the county board of commissioners, in its discretion, may create a hospital district by resolution. This authority exists only when one hospital district already exists in the county, or when a special tax levy for hospital purposes has been authorized or is now authorized with respect to a portion of the county. This power is limited to establishing a hospital district in the area lying outside the existing hospital district or outside the portion of the county in which a hospital tax levy has been or is now authorized. When a county board of commissioners exercises its power under this subsection, all other provisions of this Part shall be applicable, except as modified by this subsection.

History.

1949, c. 766, s. 5; 1953, c. 1045, s. 1; 1959, cc. 877, 1074; 1971, c. 780, s. 37.4; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 494, s. 45; c. 1090, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-42.
Hearing and determination.

After receipt of a petition for the creation of a hospital district that meets the requirements of

G.S. 131E-41(a)

and that has been approved by the county board of commissioners, the North Carolina Medical Care Commission shall give notice of a hearing on the creation of a hospital district. The notice of hearing shall be posted at the county courthouse door and at three public places within the proposed district. In addition, notice of hearing shall be published at least once for three successive weeks in a newspaper circulating in the proposed district. The notice of hearing shall specify:

The date of hearing which shall not be earlier than 20 days after the first posting and publication of notice;

The location of the hearing, which shall be within the county in which the proposed district would be located; and

That any interested person may appear and be heard at the hearing.

At the time and place specified in the notice of hearing, the North Carolina Medical Care Commission, or its designee, shall hear all interested persons, and, if necessary, adjourn and reconvene at a later time.

After the hearing, the North Carolina Medical Care Commission shall determine if it is in the public interest and beneficial to the residents of the area to create a hospital district, and, if it is, shall adopt a resolution creating the hospital district. The resolution shall define the area to be included in the hospital district. The area shall either be the one described in the petition or a part of that area. However, no municipality, in whole or in part, shall be included in a hospital district unless the governing body of the municipality shall have approved by resolution the inclusion and shall have filed a certified copy of the resolution with the North Carolina Medical Care Commission.

Each hospital district shall be designated by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission as the “ _______________ Hospital District of _______________ County,” inserting in the blank spaces a name identifying the locality and the name of the county.

The North Carolina Medical Care Commission shall give notice of the creation of a hospital district. The notice shall be published at least once for two successive weeks in the newspaper in which the notice of hearing required by G.S. 131E-42(a) was published. A notice substantially in the following form, the blanks first being properly filled in, with the printed or written signature of the executive secretary of the North Carolina Medical Care Commission appended, shall be published with the resolution:

Click to view

Click to view

The foregoing resolution was passed by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission on the day of , ; it was first published on the day of , . Any action or proceeding questioning the validity of the resolution or creation of the Hospital District of . County or the inclusion in the district of any of the areas described in the resolution must be commenced within thirty days after the first publication of this resolution.

Secretary North Carolina Medical Care Commission.

History.

1943, c. 766, s. 5; 1951, c. 805; 1953, c. 1045, ss. 1, 2; 1959, c. 877; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 1090, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1; 1999-456, s. 59.

§ 131E-43.
Limitation of actions.

Any action or proceeding in any court to set aside a resolution of the North Carolina Medical Care Commission creating any hospital district, or questioning the validity of the resolution, or the creation of any hospital district, or the inclusion in the district of any of the territory described in the resolution creating the district, must be commenced within 30 days after the first publication of the resolution and notice required by G.S. 131E-42(e). Thereafter, no right of action or defense founded upon the invalidity of a resolution or the creation of a district or the inclusion of any territory in the district shall be asserted, nor shall the validity of the resolution or the creation of the district or the inclusion of any territory be open to question in any court upon any ground, except in any action or proceeding commenced within the 30-day period.

History.

1949, c. 766, s. 5; 1951, c. 805; 1953, c. 1045, s. 2; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 1090, s. 1; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-44.
General powers.

The inhabitants of a hospital district are a body corporate and politic by the name specified by the North Carolina Medical Care Commission. Under that name they:

Are vested with all the property and rights of property belonging to any corporation;

Have perpetual succession;

May sue or be sued;

May contract;

May acquire any real or personal property;

May hold, invest, sell or dispose of property;

May have a seal and alter and renew it; and

May exercise the powers conferred upon them by this Part.

A hospital district is vested with all the powers necessary or convenient to carry out the purposes of this Part, including the following powers, which are in addition to the powers granted elsewhere:

Those powers granted under the Municipal Hospital Act, Chapter 131E of the General Statutes, Article 2, Part 1;

To issue general obligation and revenue bonds and bond anticipation notes pursuant to the Local Government Finance Act, Chapter 159 of the General Statutes;

To issue tax and revenue anticipation notes pursuant to Chapter 159 of the General Statutes, Article 9, Part 2; and

All other powers as are necessary and incidental to the exercise of the powers of this Part.

History.

1971, c. 780, s. 37.4; 1973, c. 476, s. 152; c. 494, s. 45; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-45.
County taxes.

The county board of commissioners may levy a tax for the financing of the operation, equipment, and maintenance of any hospital operated by the district, including any public or nonprofit hospital, if the tax is approved by a majority of the qualified voters of the hospital district who shall vote on the question of levying the tax. The county board of commissioners shall determine the rate or amount of taxes that will be levied if approved by the voters of the district. The election on the question of levying the tax may be held at any time fixed by the county board of commissioners and shall be conducted in the same manner as bond elections held under

G.S. 159-61

.

History.

1949, c. 766, s. 5; 1953, c. 1045, s. 6; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-46.
Referendum on repeal of tax levy.

The board of commissioners of the county in which a hospital district was created under the provisions of this Part may, if a tax levy was authorized by referendum under

G.S. 131E-45

, call a referendum on the repeal of the authority to levy a tax. Such referendum may be called only if there are no outstanding general obligation bonds of the district.

The question on the ballot shall be:

“• FOR removal of the right of the board of county commissioners to levy and collect a tax in
_______________
Hospital District of
_______________
County,“• AGAINST removal of the right of the board of county commissioners to levy and collect a tax in
_______________
Hospital District of
_______________
County.”

The referendum shall be conducted in the same manner as bond elections held under

G.S. 159-61

. No new registration of voters shall be required.

If a majority of the votes cast are in favor of the question, then beginning on the first day of the fiscal year following the date of the referendum, the board of county commissioners shall have no authority to levy a tax in the hospital district unless the voters approve under

G.S. 131E-45

. No referendum may be held within one year of the date of a referendum under this section.

History.

1983, c. 775, s. 1.

§ 131E-47.
Governing body.

The board of county commissioners of the county in which a hospital district is located shall be the governing body of the district. All of the provisions of the Municipal Hospital Act, Chapter 131E, Article 2, Part 1, shall apply to the hospital district and to the county board of commissioners as the governing body.

History.

1953, c. 1045, s. 7; 1983, c. 775, s. 1.